Arkansas, session 2025, HB1808.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 53, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 2 —— Bill of Rights for Firefighters

14-53-201. Purpose.
(a) The purpose of this subchapter is to recommend a basic Bill of
Rights for firefighters of municipalities in Arkansas.
(b) A municipality may adopt a local ordinance establishing any or all
of the procedures under this subchapter as a guide for negotiating personnel
issues with its firefighters.

14-53-202. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Firefighter” means a public servant vested by law with the
primary duty of fighting fires and providing fire protection services to a
municipality;
*SSS125*
04-07-2025 12:18:08 SSS125

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1808
(2) “Formal proceeding” means a proceeding heard before any
officer, committee, or other body of municipal government with the authority
to take disciplinary action against a firefighter; and
(3) “Official departmental charges” means a written document
from the fire chief or other lawful authority notifying the accused
firefighter that charges of misconduct have been made and setting forth the
specifics of the alleged misconduct.

14-53-203. Disciplinary proceedings.
When a firefighter is under investigation for alleged improper conduct
with a possible result of termination, demotion, or other disciplinary action
causing loss of pay or status, the following minimum standards may apply:
(1) Adverse inference shall not be drawn and no punitive action
shall be taken from a refusal of the firefighter being investigated to
participate in the investigation or be interrogated other than when the
firefighter is on duty or is otherwise fully compensated for the time spent
in accordance with municipal and departmental overtime policy, state law, and
federal law;
(2) An interrogation of a firefighter shall take place at:
(A) The office of those conducting the investigation;
(B) The place where the firefighter reports for duty; or
(C) Another reasonable place as the investigator may
determine;
(3) The firefighter being investigated shall be informed at the
commencement of his or her interrogation of:
(A) The nature of the investigation;
(B) The identity and authority of the person or persons
conducting the investigation; and
(C) The identity of all persons present during the
interrogation;
(4) During the interrogation of the firefighter, questions will
be posed by or through only one (1) interrogator at a time;
(5) An interrogation of a firefighter in connection with an
investigation shall be for a reasonable period of time and shall allow for
reasonable periods for the rest and personal necessities of the firefighter;
(6) No threat, harassment, promise, or reward shall be made to a
04-07-2025 12:18:08 SSS125

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1808
firefighter in connection with an investigation in order to induce the
answering of any questions that the firefighter has a legal right to refrain
from answering, but immunity from prosecution may be offered to induce such a
response;
(7)(A) An interrogation of a firefighter in connection with an
investigation against him or her shall be recorded in full.
(B) The firefighter may make his or her own independent
recording of the interrogation and have one (1) witness of his or her
choosing present who shall be:
(i) An attorney; or
(ii) A member of the fire department who is not
related in any way to the matter under investigation;
(8) A formal proceeding with the authority to administer
disciplinary action against a firefighter shall not be held unless official
departmental charges are brought;
(9) Official departmental charges shall contain the:
(A) Specific conduct that is alleged to be improper;
(B) Date and the time of the alleged misconduct;
(C) Witnesses whose information provided the basis for the
charges; and
(D) Specific rules, regulations, orders, or laws alleged
to have been violated;
(10)(A) A firefighter under official departmental charges is
entitled to a predisciplinary hearing before the fire chief, if the
disciplinary action is being considered.
(B) The firefighter may select a person of his or her
choosing to be present at the hearing; and
(11) A formal proceeding under which a firefighter may be
penalized shall not be brought except upon charges signed by the person
making those charges.

14-53-204. Disclosure not required for promotion or assignment.
A firefighter shall not be required to disclose any of the following
information as it relates to the firefighter or a member of the firefighter's
household for the purpose of promotion or assignment:
(1) An item of his or her property;
04-07-2025 12:18:08 SSS125

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 S4/7/25 HB1808
(2) Income;
(3) Assets;
(4) Debts; or
(5) Expenditures.

14-53-205. Notification of personnel action.
Except under exigent circumstances, a firefighter shall be notified of
the pending action by written official departmental charges a reasonable time
before the action is taken when a personnel action may result in a loss of:
(1) Pay;
(2) Benefits; or
(3) Status.

14-53-206. Participation in political activities.
Except when on duty or acting in his or her official capacity, a
firefighter of a municipality shall not be:
(1) Prohibited from engaging in political activity; or
(2) Denied the right to refrain from engaging in the political
activity.

14-53-207. No retaliation for exercise of rights —— Other legal
remedies.
(a) A firefighter shall not be penalized or threatened with a penalty
for exercising his or her rights under this subchapter.
(b) This subchapter is not an exclusive legal remedy for a firefighter
with respect to any rights a firefighter has under this subchapter.

/s/A. Collins








04-07-2025 12:18:08 SSS125